Hawaii statutes.
§448E-9 Unlicensed activity. (a) No
person shall act or assume to act as a journey worker electrician, journey
worker specialty electrician, supervising electrician, supervising specialty
electrician, journey worker plumber, master plumber, maintenance electrician,
journey worker industrial electrician, or supervising industrial electrician,
or advertise or hold the person's self out as an electrician or plumber,
without a license previously obtained in compliance with this chapter and the
rules of the board; provided that any person may perform emergency plumbing
repair work in the person's principal place of residence when such repairs do
not involve or require rearrangement of valves, pipes, or fixtures; provided
further that no such emergency repairs may be performed on sewer lines, drains,
gas lines, and on fixtures being served with backflow devices which include
heaters, water closets, dishwashers, and garbage disposal units.

For purposes of this subsection:

"Electrician" means any person who
performs electrical work and includes but is not limited to any person who acts
as a journey worker electrician, journey worker specialty electrician,
supervising electrician, supervising specialty electrician, maintenance
electrician, journey worker industrial electrician, or supervising industrial
electrician.

"Plumber" means any person who
performs plumbing work and includes but is not limited to any person who acts
as a journey worker plumber or master plumber.

(b) An apprentice or trainee learning the trade
of a person licensed under this chapter shall not be required to have a license
if the apprentice or trainee acts under the supervision of a person
appropriately licensed under this chapter.

(c) Upon entry of a judgment by a court of
competent jurisdiction finding that the person has advertised in violation of
this section, the entity furnishing voice communication service to the
violator shall disconnect the telephone number contained in the advertisement
or listing. [L 1971, c 183, pt of §1; am L 1976, c 210, §1; am L 1978, c 209,
§1; am L 1982, c 205, §4; am L 1983, c 56, §5; gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 2006, c
186, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next